src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON NYOBL
                  +Sg+Nom:     K     ;
                  +Sg+Nom:     RHyph ;
          +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:aj    K     ;
             +Ess+Err/Orth:n    K     ;
          +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:     K     ;
          +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:     RHyph ;
          +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:v    K     ;
          +Sg+Ine+Err/Orth:n    K     ;
          +Sg+Ela+Err/Orth:as    K     ;
          +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:     K     ;
          +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:j    K     ;
          +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:j    RHyph ;
          +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:jt   K     ;
          +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:jda  K     ;
          +Pl+Ine+Err/Orth:jn   K     ;
          +Pl+Ela+Err/Orth:js   K     ;
          +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:j    K     ;
          +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:jn   K     ;
          +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:a    K     ;
          +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:a    RHyph ;
                   +Sg+Ill:aj   K     ;
                      +Ess:an   K     ;
                   +Sg+Gen:a    K     ;
          +Sg+Gen+Use/Circ:a    RHyph ; !  !
                   +Sg+Acc:av   K     ;
                   +Sg+Ine:an   K     ;
                   +Sg+Ela:as   K     ;
                   +Pl+Nom:a    K     ;
                   +Pl+Gen:aj   K     ;
          +Pl+Gen+Use/Circ:aj   RHyph ; ! !
                   +Pl+Acc:ajt  K     ;
                   +Pl+Ill:ajda K     ;
                   +Pl+Ine:ajn  K     ;
                   +Pl+Ela:ajs  K     ;
                   +Pl+Com:aj   K     ;
                   +Sg+Com:ajn  K     ;

LEXICON NYOBL-ORG
                  +Sg+Nom:    K     ;
                  +Sg+Nom:    RHyph ;
         +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:aj   K    ;
            +Ess+Err/Orth:n   K     ;
         +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:    K     ;
         +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:    RHyph ;
         +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:v   K     ;
         +Sg+Ine+Err/Orth:n   K     ;
         +Sg+Ela+Err/Orth:as   K    ;
! +Pl+Nom: K ;
! +Pl+Gen:j K ;
! +Pl+Gen:j RHyph ;
! +Pl+Acc:jt K ;
! +Pl+Ill:jda K ;
! +Pl+Ine:jn K ;
! +Pl+Ela:js K ;
! +Pl+Com:j K ;
          +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:jn  K     ;
          +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:a   K     ;
          +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:a   RHyph ;
                  +Sg+Ill+:aj  K     ;
                     +Ess+:an  K     ;
                  +Sg+Gen+:a   K     ;
         +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth+:a   RHyph ; !  !
                  +Sg+Acc+:av  K     ;
                  +Sg+Ine+:an  K     ;
                  +Sg+Ela+:as  K     ;
        ! +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:a K ;   !
! +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:aj K ;   !
! +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:aj RHyph ;     ! !
! +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:ajt K ;   !
! +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:ajda K ;   !
! +Pl+Ine+Err/Orth:ajn K ;   !
! +Pl+Ela+Err/Orth:ajs K ;   !
! +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:aj K ;   !
                 +Sg+Com:ajn K     ;


!! Words in DUBAI lexicon end on vowel+vowel and have no cg. Last syllable is stressed, and they work like standard C-final 4-syllabic stems (like gånågis, etc). Get an even syllable case marking. Non-assmilated stems.

LEXICON DUBAI-fem !!= @CODE@ I-final names. No cg. Female names
! Different lexicon for female persons. Audhild.
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>             DUBAIDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@i #     ;

!!€gt-norm: Mai  # Even-syllable test
!!€ Mai:                Mai+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom
!!€ Maiaj:              Mai+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill
!!€ Maias:              Mai+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela

LEXICON DUBAI-femsur !!= @CODE@ I-final names. No cg. Female names also used as surnames
							+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>             DUBAIDECL ;
							+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>             DUBAIDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@i #     ;

LEXICON DUBAI-obj !!= @CODE@ I-final names. No cg. Object names
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> DUBAIDECL ;

!!€gt-norm: Hyundai  # Even-syllable test
!!€ Hyundai:                Hyundai+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom
!!€ Hyundaiaj:              Hyundai+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill
!!€ Hyundaias:              Hyundai+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela

LEXICON DUBAI-org !!= @CODE@ Organizations
! Different lexicon for organisations. Microsoft.
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> DUBAIDECL-ORG ;

!!€gt-norm: Khoi # Even-syllable test
!!€ Khoi:               Khoi+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom
!!€ Khoiaj:              Khoi+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill
!!€ Khoias:              Khoi+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela

LEXICON DUBAI-mal !!= @CODE@ Male names
! Different lexicon for male persons. Finn. Torfinn.
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>             DUBAIDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@i #     ;

!!€gt-norm: Kublai # Even-syllable test
!!€ Kublai:               Kublai+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom
!!€ Kublaiaj:              Kublai+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill
!!€ Kublaias:              Kublai+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela

LEXICON DUBAI-sur !!= @CODE@ Surnames
! Different lexicon for personal surnames. Blind
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>             DUBAIDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@i #     ;

!!€gt-norm: Maarthai # Even-syllable test
!!€ Maarthai:               Maarthai+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom
!!€ Maarthaiaj:              Maarthai+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill
!!€ Maarthaias:              Maarthai+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela

LEXICON DUBAI-plc !!= @CODE@ Place names
! Different lexicon for place names. Bern.
                   +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>                DUBAIDECL-PLC ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen@U.Cap.Opt@:i%>a00@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK        ;

!!€gt-norm: Madurai # Even-syllable test
!!€ Madurai:                 Madurai+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom
!!€ Maduraiaj:              Madurai+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill
!!€ Maduraias:              Madurai+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela
!!€ maduraiak:              Madurai+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom

LEXICON DUBAIDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ DUBAIUCASE ;

LEXICON DUBAIDECL-PLC
          @U.Cap.Obl@               DUBAIUCASE ;
+Err/Orth0@U.Cap.Opt@:ia@U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ       ;

LEXICON DUBAIDECL-ORG
 @U.Cap.Obl@ DUBAIUCASE-ORG ;


LEXICON DUBAIUCASE ! Final foot structure (X) => Loc:as
 +Sg+Nom:i     K     ;
 +Sg+Nom:i     RHyph ;
 +Sg+Ill:iaj   K     ;
    +Ess:ian   K     ;
 +Sg+Gen:ia    K     ;
 +Sg+Gen:ia    K     ;
 +Sg+Gen:ia    RHyph ;
 +Sg+Acc:iav   K     ;
 +Sg+Ine:ian   K     ;
 +Sg+Ela:ias   K     ;
 +Pl+Nom:ia    K     ;
 +Pl+Gen:iaj   K     ;
 +Pl+Gen:iaj   RHyph ;
 +Pl+Acc:iajt  K     ;
 +Pl+Ill:iajda K     ;
 +Pl+Ine:iajn  K     ;
 +Pl+Ela:iajs  K     ;
 +Pl+Com:iaj   K     ;
 +Sg+Com:iajn  K     ;


LEXICON DUBAIUCASE-ORG ! Final foot structure (X) => Loc:as
 +Sg+Nom:i    K     ;
 +Sg+Nom:i    RHyph ;
 +Sg+Ill:iaj  K     ;
    +Ess:ian  K     ;
 +Sg+Gen:ia   K     ;
 +Sg+Gen:ia   K     ;
 +Sg+Gen:ia   RHyph ;
 +Sg+Acc:iav  K     ;
 +Sg+Ine:ian  K     ;
 +Sg+Ela:ias  K     ;
! +Pl+Nom:ija K ;
! +Pl+Gen:ijaj K ;
! +Pl+Gen:ijaj RHyph ;
! +Pl+Acc:ijajt K ;
! +Pl+Ill:ijajda K ;
! +Pl+Ine:ijajn K ;
! +Pl+Ela:ijajs K ;
! +Pl+Com:ijaj K ;
 +Sg+Com:iajn K     ;


!! Words in lexicon BERN end on conconant, no cg, case marking with -av, -aj, -as, etc. Last syllable is stressed, and therefore they work like standard C-final 4-syllabic stems (like gånågis, etc). Get an even syllable case marking. Both assimilated and non-assmilated stems.

LEXICON BERN-ani !!= @CODE@  Animals
!Different lexicon for animals. Eurokas.
 +N+Prop+Sem/Ani:%> BERNDECL ;

!!€gt-norm: Lillemor # Even-syllable test
!!€ Lillemor:               Lillemor+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Nom
!!€ Lillemoraj:              Lillemor+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ill
!!€ Lillemoras:              Lillemor+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ela

LEXICON BERN-mal !!= @CODE@  Male names
! Different lexicon for male persons. Finn. Torfinn.
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>                BERNDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #        ;

!!€gt-norm: Eystein # Even-syllable test
!!€ Eystein:                Eystein+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom
!!€ Eysteinaj:              Eystein+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill
!!€ Eysteinas:              Eystein+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela
