src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ProperNoun
Amminadav BERN-mal ;
Avihud BERN-mal ;
Beroias:Beroi^as BERN-mal ;
Beroias:Bero^ias BERN-mal ;
Ever BERN-mal ;
Jisjaj BERN-mal ;
Joses BERN-mal ;
Joses BERN-mal ;
Mattatias:Mattati^as BERN-mal ;
Metusjelah BERN-mal ;
Naksjon:Naksjon BERN-mal ;
Ram:Ram BERN-mal ;
Seus:Se^us BERN-mal ;
Stefanos BERN-mal ;
Stefanos BERN-mal ;
Symeon:Syme^on BERN-mal ;
Symeon:Syme^on BERN-mal ;
Thom BERN-mal ;
Áillohaš BERN-mal ;
